Tennessee, session 114, SB1344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-3-303(b), is amended by deleting
the language "then the urban services district, but not the general services district," and
substituting "then the urban services district and the general services district".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-3-106, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
(m) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, if a metropolitan government
approves by local option election under this section the retail sale of liquor within its
jurisdiction, then a retailer's license may be issued to a qualified applicant to operate a
package store within the jurisdiction of the metropolitan government, including within a
general services district of the metropolitan government.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-3-205(a), is amended by deleting
"or within a civil district of a county" and substituting ", within the urban or general services
district of a metropolitan government, or within a civil district of a county".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1344
002470
- 1 -